Repository navigation
2nd declension genitive formation
Supreme Overlord edited this page Jun 7, 2026
·
3 revisions
Due to the Standard's inconsistent wording, it is not useful as a reference. As such, this page will document the research I did on the 2nd declension nouns' genitive formations. The goal is eventually to have a set of parameters that, given that a noun is in the 2nd declension, can be used to reliably transform nominative forms into genitive forms.
Examining the data that is in the database, these are the patterns I have noticed.
These patterns exhaustively match all valid 2nd declension nouns in the database.
| Pattern Name | Mutation of nominative |
|---|---|
| + e | Add -e to Nominative |
| Palatalization + e | Palatalize according to normal rules and add -e |
| Alternative Palatalization + e | Like previous, palatalized normally except ea becomes ei, then add -e |
| í | íoch -> í |
| aí | ach -> aí |
| íne | íon -> íne |
| ingthe | ingt -> ingthe |
| Syncope + e | Syncopate nominative and add -e |
| Palatalized syncope + e | Syncopated, then palatalized normally, then add -e |
| Alternative Palatalization Syncope + e | Like previous, palatalized normally except ea becomes ei, then add -e |
| Exception | Don't follow above rules, but still are 2nd declension. scian, caileann, blocshliabh |
- As noted by the Standard, all of them are feminine, end with consonant in nominative, and end with -e, aí, or í in the genitive. From this point on the change will be noted with respect to the nominative.
- Nouns ending on slender consonants do not ever undergo any palatalization directly. If there is palatalization done, it is first syncopated.
- There are some exceptional transformations that don't appear to apply to any other nouns:
- scian -> scine -- The a is simply dropped
- caileann -> caille -- The ann is simply dropped
- blocshliabh -> blocsléibhe -- While the -liabh is changed to -léibhe, note that the shl is also unlenited.
- There was only one -ingt word in the database, tuirlingt, but the same transformation applies to tarraingt, so I think that is enough to note as its own rule.
- The vast majority of nouns that end on slender consonants will get +e.
- If it ends on a slender vowel, it is always i. (Just an Irish thing, perhaps?)
There may be more general patterns that I am missing.
- Nouns in the í, aí, íne, and ingthe groups and exceptions will follow those always. Otherwise, generally, the following rules apply.
- For nouns ending in slender consonants, the Alternative Palatalization Syncope + e rule applies to:
- obair and all compounds thereof
- domhain
- seamair
- sluasaid
- fothair
- Syncope + e applies to:
- i + [gd]h + i + consonant
- -short vowel/í + [tfd] + ir
- some words ending in consonant + il, but there's no reliable way to tell which ones. E.g. scidil -> scidile, but caibidil -> caibidle
- -inis
- trilis
- Almost all other nouns ending in slender consonants, however, simply just get +e.
- What the standard was trying to say is that only beann and circe are the exceptions where ea is changed to i in monosyllabic nouns. Every other monosyllabic noun ending on ea + consonant is changed to ei.
- For polysyllabic nouns, the ea may be any of Syncope + e, Palatalized + e, or Palatalized Alternative + e. There does not seem to be any correlation between syllable stress and rule. There are some patterns that apply, that probably need more elaboration later.
- All nouns ending in broad consonant clusters that are not -ea are just Palatalized + e.